Missouri, session 2026, HB2297.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 272, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto two new sections, to be
known as sections 272.138 and 272.380, to read as follows:
272.138. 1. When an owner of real estate desires to construct, maintain, or
repair a division fence to enclose a field or enclosure where animals are kept as provided
under section 272.010, such owner, or a contractor hired by such owner, may enter on
the adjoining property up to a distance of ten feet for the length of such division fence to
construct, maintain, or repair such division fence. The owner or contractor
constructing, maintaining, or repairing such division fence is not guilty of trespass for
entering onto the adjoining property during the construction, maintenance, or repair of
such division fence, provided that the owner or contractor does not enter onto the
adjoining property beyond the ten feet specified in this section. However, such owner or
contractor shall be liable for all damages, if any, caused by entry onto the adjoining
property, including damages to crops. Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary,
the owner or contractor that constructs, maintains, or repairs such division fence under
this section shall not be liable for damages for clearing or removing any tree, brush, or
vegetation that lies directly upon the property boundary line where such division fence
is constructed, maintained, or repaired, so that such division fence may be constructed,
maintained, or repaired upon such property boundary line. The provisions of this
section shall not apply when the adjoining property is owned or operated by any utility
company, railroad, a zoological park, wildlife conservation facility, or animal sanctuary
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2297 2
accredited by the Association of Zoos and Aquariums or a similarly recognized
accrediting body. Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow an owner or
contractor to enter into a building on the adjoining property.
2. Except as provided in section 537.351, the owner of the adjoining property
owes no duty of care to give any general or specific warning with respect to any natural
or artificial condition, structure, or personal property thereon to any person who enters
on such adjoining property with the purpose to construct, repair, or maintain a division
fence under this section.
272.380. 1. When an owner of real estate desires to construct, maintain, or
repair a division fence to enclose a field or enclosure where animals are kept or placed
as provided under section 272.220, such owner, or a contractor hired by such owner,
may enter on the adjoining property up to a distance of ten feet for the length of such
division fence to construct, maintain, or repair such division fence. The owner or
contractor constructing, maintaining, or repairing such division fence is not guilty of
trespass for entering onto the adjoining property during the construction, maintenance,
or repair of such division fence, provided that the owner or contractor does not enter
onto the adjoining property beyond the ten feet specified in this section. However, such
owner or contractor shall be liable for all damages, if any, caused by entry onto the
adjoining property, including damages to crops. Notwithstanding any provision to the
contrary, the owner or contractor that constructs, maintains, or repairs such division
fence under this section shall not be liable for damages for clearing or removing any
tree, brush, or vegetation that lies directly upon the property boundary line where such
division fence is constructed, maintained, or repaired, so that such division fence may be
constructed, maintained, or repaired upon such property boundary line. The provisions
of this section shall not apply when the adjoining property is owned or operated by any
utility company, railroad, a zoological park, wildlife conservation facility, or animal
sanctuary accredited by the Association of Zoos and Aquariums or a similarly
recognized accrediting body. Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow an
owner or contractor to enter into a building on the adjoining property.
2. Except as provided in section 537.351, the owner of the adjoining property
owes no duty of care to give any general or specific warning with respect to any natural
or artificial condition, structure, or personal property thereon to any person who enters
on such adjoining property with the purpose to construct, repair, or maintain a division
fence under this section.
✔